Arkansas, session 2025, SB589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 6, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 5 — 340B Program Transparency Act

20-6-501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "340B Program
Transparency Act".

20-6-502. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "340B program" means the federal drug discount program
*JMB451*
03/31/2025 1:46:16 PM JMB451

SB589
established under Section 340B of the Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. §
256b, as it existed on January 1, 2025, that requires a drug manufacturer to
provide discounted outpatient medications to a covered entity that serves a
significant number of low-income and uninsured patients;
(2) "340B savings" means the difference between the actual price
paid by a covered entity or its contract pharmacy under the 340B program for
a given drug or biological product and one (1) of the following acquisition
costs, applied in the order of priority stated below, using date-sensitive
and comparable data:
(A)(i) The actual acquisition cost the covered entity or
contract pharmacy has paid for the same drug or biological product when
dispensed to non-340B qualifying patients based on verifiable transaction
records from the same month as the 340B purchase.
(ii) If data from the same month is not available,
then data from the same calendar quarter shall be used;
(B) The actual acquisition cost for the same drug or
biological product as reflected in published acquisition data from the same
month, if available, or from the same calendar quarter if monthly data is not
available, and that is accessible to the covered entity or contract pharmacy
from a distributor or group purchasing organization, as long as the
distributor or group purchasing organization was utilized to acquire the drug
or biological product by the covered entity or contract pharmacy within the
same month or calendar quarter; or
(C)(i) If neither subdivision (2)(A) or subdivision (2)(B)
of this section is available for the specific product, the estimated
acquisition cost the covered entity or contract pharmacy would have paid for
the drug or biological product in the absence of participation in the 340B
program, ensuring to the extent possible that the estimation uses data from
the same month or, if not available, from the same calendar quarter.
(ii) A covered entity or contract pharmacy shall
rely on subdivision (2)(C) of this section only if neither subdivision (2)(A)
or subdivision (2)(B) of this section is feasible for that specific drug or
biological product;
(3) "Contract pharmacy" means a pharmacy that has executed a
contract with a covered entity to dispense 340B drugs on behalf of the
covered entity consistent with federal regulations and guidelines;
03/31/2025 1:46:16 PM JMB451

SB589
(4) "Covered entity" means a hospital or other healthcare
provider located in this state that participates in the 340B program as
defined by 42 U.S.C. § 256b, as it existed on January 1, 2025; and
(5)(A) "Medically underserved area" means an entire county that,
at any point during the reporting period, has an active medically underserved
area designation from the United States Health Resources and Services
Administration if the medically underserved area designation is for a single
county and has not been withdrawn or proposed for withdrawal.
(B) "Medically underserved area" does not include a
medically underserved area that is for a county subdivision, partial areas of
a county, a census tract, or other smaller geographic unit or that has been
withdrawn or proposed for withdrawal.

20-6-503. Annual 340B transparency report.
(a)(1) Each covered entity shall submit an annual 340B transparency
report to the Department of Health on or before March 31 of each year,
covering the previous calendar year.
(2) The department shall develop a standard reporting form
consistent with the requirements of this subchapter.
(b) At a minimum, a covered entity shall report:
(1) Aggregate 340B savings for the prior calendar year,
including without limitation:
(A) The total number of prescription, infusion, and
injection drug claims processed by the covered entity or its contract
pharmacies;
(B) The total number of 340B-eligible prescription,
infusion, and injection drug claims processed by the covered entity or its
contract pharmacies;
(C) An estimate of the total 340B savings realized by the
covered entity; and
(D) A description of the methodology used to calculate the
aggregate 340B savings;
(2) Utilization of 340B savings, including a detailed accounting
of how the 340B savings were allocated or reinvested, specifying:
(A)(i)(a) The aggregate amount directed toward offsetting
the cost of uncompensated care or charity care.
03/31/2025 1:46:16 PM JMB451

SB589
(b) The amount reported under subdivision
(b)(2)(A)(i)(a) of this section shall reflect only the funds actually
disbursed or redeemed from the 340B savings, rather than merely allocated or
earmarked for future use.
(ii) However, for purposes of this calculation:
(a) Contractual discounts or adjustments
already applied by insurance companies or government healthcare programs
shall not be included;
(b) Charges for denied services or medical
supplies unrelated to the drug or biological product, or unrelated to the
administration of the drug or biological product, shall not be included; and
(c) Any other discounts, reductions,
incentives, or offsets that covered entity patients customarily receive in
the normal course of business shall not be included;
(B)(i) The aggregate amount directed to patient financial
assistance or support programs, including without limitation transportation,
nutritional counseling, and housing assistance.
(ii) The amount reported shall reflect only the
funds actually disbursed or redeemed from the 340B savings, rather than
merely allocated or earmarked for future use;
(C) The aggregate amount used to expand patient access to
healthcare services, including without limitation new facility or clinic
sites, extended hours, or additional programs that directly expand patient
access to healthcare services for populations living in and having a primary
residence located in a medically underserved area in this state;
(D) The aggregate amount directed, used, or allocated to
administrative operations, including without limitation:
(i) Salaries, wages, bonuses, and other forms of
employee compensation;
(ii) Benefits, such as retirement contributions,
health insurance premiums, or stipends;
(iii) General overhead expenses, including without
limitation facility maintenance, utilities, office supplies, and information
technology;
(iv) Marketing, public relations, or advertising
costs;
03/31/2025 1:46:16 PM JMB451

SB589
(v) Management or consulting fees; and
(vi) Any other administrative expenditures not
directly related to patient care or financial assistance;
(E) The amount allocated to any foundations or charitable
organizations affiliated with the covered entity;
(F) Any other uses of 340B savings, itemized to provide
meaningful transparency without disclosing confidential business information
that is protected by state or federal law; and
(G) The total amounts disclosed under subdivisions
(b)(2)(A)-(F) of this section, which do not exceed the total amount reported
under subdivision (b)(1)(C) of this section;
(3) The charity care and uncompensated care metrics provided by
the covered entity, including without limitation:
(A) The total dollar value of charity care or
uncompensated care provided by the covered entity;
(B) The total dollar value of bad debt or unreimbursed
care; and
(C)(i) The distinct number of patients receiving charity
care or financial assistance.
(ii) The metric under subdivision (b)(3)(C)(i) of
this section shall be disclosed:
(a) As an aggregate; and
(b) By county, where county is based on the
patient’s home address or primary place of residence;
(4) Populations served, including without limitation:
(A)(i) The total number of distinct patients who receive
services from the covered entity.
(ii) The metric under subdivision (b)(4)(A)(i) of
this section shall be disclosed:
(a) As an aggregate; and
(b) By county, where county is based on the
patient's home address or primary place of residence; and
(B)(i) The total number of distinct patients who received
services from the covered entity with a home address or primary place of
residence located within a medically underserved area.
(ii) The metric under subdivision (b)(4)(B)(i) of
03/31/2025 1:46:16 PM JMB451

SB589
this section shall be disclosed:
(a) As an aggregate; and
(b) By county, where county is based on the
patient's home address or primary place of residence;
(5) The total number of distinct clinics or facilities, listed
by physical address, operated by the covered entity located within a
medically underserved area;
(6) The total number of distinct patients who received services
from the clinics or facilities operated by the covered entity located within
a medically underserved area; and
(7) Contract pharmacy arrangements, including without
limitation:
(A) The name and address of each contract pharmacy; and
(B) The total number of 340B-eligible claims processed
through each contract pharmacy.
(c)(1) The department shall post each covered entity’s 340B
transparency report on a publicly accessible website no later than sixty (60)
days after the annual submission deadline, redacting any trade secrets or
proprietary data that is exempt from disclosure under Arkansas law.
(2) A covered entity may request that specific information be
classified as confidential, subject to review and approval by the department
under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

20-6-504. Enforcement — Penalties.
(a) The Department of Health may:
(1) Receive and review annual 340B transparency reports for
completeness and accuracy; and
(2) Conduct compliance audits or investigations of a covered
entity’s 340B activities, as necessary, to verify the accuracy of reported
information.
(b)(1) If the department determines that a covered entity has failed to
submit a timely or complete 340B transparency report, the department shall
notify the covered entity in writing and provide thirty (30) days for the
covered entity to cure the deficiency.
(2) If the covered entity fails to cure the deficiency within
thirty (30) days, the department may impose an administrative penalty not to
03/31/2025 1:46:16 PM JMB451

SB589
exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per day for each day of noncompliance,
subject to a maximum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) per
year.
(3) The department may waive or reduce penalties upon a showing
of good cause.

20-6-505. Rules.
(a) The Department of Health shall promulgate rules to implement and
administer this subchapter.
(b) The rules under subsection (a) of this section shall include
without limitation:
(1) The development of standardized reporting forms and
procedures;
(2) The process for requesting confidential treatment of
proprietary information; and
(3) The criteria for determining penalties for noncompliance.

20-6-506. Construction.
(a) This subchapter does not conflict with or preempt any federal law
or regulation governing the 340B program.
(b) To the extent a provision of this subchapter is in conflict with
federal law, that provision of this subchapter is void.

20-6-507. Severability.
If a section, subsection, subdivision, sentence, or clause of this
subchapter is held invalid or unconstitutional, the remaining provisions
shall remain in force and shall be construed to give effect to the intent of
the subchapter.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective date.
This act is effective on and after January 1, 2026.





03/31/2025 1:46:16 PM JMB451